Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.080

Other lands not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect any land deeded in trust to the department of natural resources or its successors pursuant to the provisions of Title 76 RCW.

[ 1988 c 128 s 7; 1972 ex.s. c 150 s 9.]